Illinois, session 104th, SB2820.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Prohibited Hiring of Federal Immigration Officers Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Federal immigration officer" does not include an 8individual who is employed solely in an administrative role or 9as a customs officer at an airport or other port of entry.10    "Law enforcement agency" means any entity with statutory 11police powers and the ability to employ individuals authorized 12to make arrests. "Law enforcement agency" includes, but is not 13limited to, the Illinois State Police; any local law 14enforcement agency; and any university, college, or community 15college with statutory police powers and the ability to employ 16individuals authorized to make arrests.17    "Law enforcement officer" means (i) any police officer of 18a law enforcement agency who is primarily responsible for 19prevention or detection of crime and the enforcement of the 20criminal code, traffic, or highway laws of this State or any 21political subdivision of this State or (ii) any member of a 22police force appointed and maintained as provided in Section 2 23of the Railroad Police Act.  SB2820- 2 -LRB104 17954 RTM 31391 b1    "Local law enforcement agency" has the meaning given in 2Section 2 of the Illinois Police Training Act. 3    Section 10. Federal immigration officer; prohibition on 4hiring. Notwithstanding any other law, a law enforcement 5agency may not hire as a law enforcement officer any person who 6was hired as a federal immigration officer by the U.S. 7Department of Immigration and Customs Enforcement between 8January 20, 2025 and January 20, 2029. 9    Section 15. Home rule. A home rule unit may not regulate 10the hiring of law enforcement officers in a manner 11inconsistent with this Act. This Act is a limitation under 12subsection (i) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois 13Constitution on the concurrent exercise by home rule units of 14powers and functions exercised by the State.